Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Sickle Cell Disease Detection

402.310.
Sickle Cell Disease Detection Act.

KRS

402.310

to

402.340

may be cited as the Kentucky Sickle Cell Disease Detection Act of 1972.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 122, § 1.

402.320.
Marriage license applicants to be tested for trait or genetically transmitted disease affecting hemoglobin — Counseling carriers.

Every physician examining applicants for a marriage license may obtain an appropriate blood specimen from each applicant and forward same to the Division of Laboratory Services, Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or to a laboratory approved by the cabinet, to ascertain the existence or nonexistence of sickle cell trait or sickle cell disease, or any other genetically transmitted disease which affects hemoglobin. In the event the laboratory tests indicate that both applicants are carriers of a trait or disease, the physician may provide genetic counseling or refer the applicants to the cabinet or to an agency approved by the cabinet for such counseling.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 122, § 2; 1974, ch. 273, § 1; 1998, ch. 426, § 577, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 622, effective June 20, 2005.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The medical examination mentioned in KRS

402.130

(repealed) relates only to syphilis tests and the sickle cell test under this section is left to the discretion of the examining physician.

OAG 75-594

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Marriage License, § 5.4.

402.330.
Testing of newborn child for sickle cell trait or disease. [Repealed.]

402.340.
Secretary for Health and Family Services to administer and enforce Sickle Cell Disease Detection Act.

The secretary for health and family services shall adopt rules and regulations for the proper administration and enforcement of KRS

402.310

to

402.340

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 122, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(10); 1998, ch. 426, § 578, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 623, effective June 20, 2005.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a county clerk’s deputy deliberately backdates a marriage application in order to avoid the three-day waiting period, the clerk’s failure to take action against the deputy and failure to explain the circumstances when mailing the application to the Department of Human Resources (now Cabinet for Health and Family Services) as required under either KRS

213.330

(repealed), for purposes of vital statistics records, or this section, in connection with the sickle cell detection program, would not be relevant to the clerk’s liability under the penalty provision of KRS 402.990(9) (now (7)).

OAG 84-79

.